New York, session 2025-2026, A6420.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the alcoholic beverage control law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision 39 to read as follows: 3 39. "Private membership establishment" shall mean an association oper- 4 ated by an individual, corporation, partnership, company, or any other 5 for-profit entity which is the owner, lessee, or occupant of a premises 6 used exclusively for such association's purposes, and which is operated 7 solely for a recreational, social, communal workspace or athletic 8 purposes. A "member" of a private membership establishment shall mean a 9 person who, whether a charter member or admitted in agreement with the 10 by-laws of such private membership establishment, has become a bona fide 11 member thereof, who maintains the private membership by the payment of 12 their annual dues in a bona fide manner in accordance with the by-laws 13 and whose name and address is entered on such private membership estab- 14 lishment's list of members. A private membership establishment must have 15 one hundred or more members and shall be subject to the provisions of 16 section one hundred ten of this chapter. Private membership establish- 17 ments may have ticketed events for their members or members' guests, but 18 a business or facility that sells tickets to the general public shall 19 not be considered a private membership establishment. 20 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage control 21 law, as amended by chapter 258 of the laws of 1976, is amended to read 22 as follows: 23 5. No retail license under this section shall be granted except for 24 such premises as are being conducted as a bona fide hotel provided that EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00724-01-5 A. 6420 2 1 a restaurant is operated in such premises, restaurant, catering estab- 2 lishment, club, private membership establishment, railroad car, vessel 3 or aircraft being operated on regularly scheduled flights by a United 4 States certificated airline. 5 § 3. Subdivision 8 of section 106 of the alcoholic beverage control 6 law is amended to read as follows: 7 8. A private membership establishment, club or a luncheon club 8 licensed to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall 9 be permitted to sell such beverages only to its members and to their 10 guests accompanying them. 11 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.